src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_RAIŠ-SG
:	NMN_RAIŠ-SG	;

LEXICON N_RAIŠ-PL
:	NMN_RAIŠ-PL	;

LEXICON N_TOVESTEH !!≈ @CODE@ tovesteh:tovesteh
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_TOVESTEH-SG	;
	N_TOVESTEH-PL	;
LEXICON N_TOVESTEH-SG
:%{back%}	NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH-SG	;

LEXICON N_TOVESTEH-PL
:%{back%}	NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH-PL	;

LEXICON N_PEREH !!≈ @CODE@ pereh:pereh
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Front
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_PEREH-SG	;
	N_PEREH-PL	;
LEXICON N_PEREH-SG
:%{front%}	NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH-SG	;

LEXICON N_PEREH-PL
:%{front%}	NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH-PL	;

LEXICON N_HUIKEH !!≈ @CODE@ huikeh:huikkeh
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
!:%^WGStem ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_HUIKEH-SG	;
	N_HUIKEH-PL	;
LEXICON N_HUIKEH-SG
:%{back%}	NMN_HUIKEH/LIIKEH-SG	;

LEXICON N_HUIKEH-PL
:%{back%}	NMN_HUIKEH/LIIKEH-PL	;

LEXICON N_LIIKEH !!≈ @CODE@ liikeh:liikkeh
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
!:%^WGStem ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_LIIKEH-SG	;
	N_LIIKEH-PL	;
LEXICON N_LIIKEH-SG
:%{front%}	NMN_HUIKEH/LIIKEH-SG	;

LEXICON N_LIIKEH-PL
:%{front%}	NMN_HUIKEH/LIIKEH-PL	;

LEXICON N_PENGER !!≈ @CODE@ penger:penger
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Front
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_PENGER-SG	;
	N_PENGER-PL	;
LEXICON N_PENGER-SG
:	NMN_PENGER-SG	;

LEXICON N_PENGER-PL
:	NMN_PENGER-PL	;

LEXICON N_ARTELI !!≈ @CODE@ arteli:arteli
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
!:%{back%} ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_ARTELI-SG ;
	N_ARTELI-PL ;
LEXICON N_ARTELI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_ARTELI/LEIRI-SG ;
LEXICON N_ARTELI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_ARTELI/LEIRI-PL ;

LEXICON N_PUHTAHUS !!≈ @CODE@ puhtahus:puhtahu
!! Harmony: Back
!! Gradation NA
!:%{back%}%>s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_PUHTAHUS-SG ;
        N_PUHTAHUS-PL ;
LEXICON N_PUHTAHUS-SG
:%{back%} NMN_PUHTAHUS/VÄHYS-SG ;
LEXICON N_PUHTAHUS-PL
:%{back%} NMN_PUHTAHUS/VÄHYS-PL ;

LEXICON N_VÄHYS !!≈ @CODE@ vähys:vähy
!! Harmony: Back
!! Gradation NA
!:%{back%}%>s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_VÄHYS-SG ;
        N_VÄHYS-PL ;
LEXICON N_VÄHYS-SG
:%{front%} NMN_PUHTAHUS/VÄHYS-SG ;
LEXICON N_VÄHYS-PL
:%{front%} NMN_PUHTAHUS/VÄHYS-PL ;


LEXICON N_AIGOMUS
 N_ALUS ;

LEXICON N_ALUS !!≈ @CODE@ alus:aluks
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
!:%^KS2S ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_ALUS-SG ;
 N_ALUS-PL ;

LEXICON N_ALUS-SG !!≈ @CODE@ alus:aluks
:%{back%} NMN_ALUS/ILVES-SG ;

LEXICON N_ALUS-PL !!≈ @CODE@ alus:aluks
:%{back%} NMN_ALUS/ILVES-PL ;

LEXICON N_ILVES !!≈ @CODE@ ilves:ilveks
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Front
!:%^KS2S ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_ILVES-SG ;
 N_ILVES-PL ;

LEXICON N_ILVES-SG !!≈ @CODE@ ilves:ilveks
:%{front%} NMN_ALUS/ILVES-SG ;

LEXICON N_ILVES-PL !!≈ @CODE@ ilves:ilveks
:%{front%} NMN_ALUS/ILVES-PL ;

LEXICON N_MIES !!≈ @CODE@ mies:mie
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Front
!:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_MIES-SG ;
 N_MIES-PL ;

LEXICON N_MIES-SG !!≈ @CODE@ mies:mie
:%{front%} NMN_MIES-SG ;

LEXICON N_MIES-PL !!≈ @CODE@ mies:mie
:%{front%} NMN_MIES-PL ;

LEXICON N_KUURNIS !!≈ @CODE@ kuurnis:kuurne
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:%>is ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_KUURNIS-SG ;
        N_KUURNIS-PL ;
LEXICON N_KUURNIS-SG
:%{back%} NMN_KUURNIS-SG ;
LEXICON N_KUURNIS-PL
:%{back%} NMN_KUURNIS-PL ;

LEXICON N_SUALIŠ !!≈ @CODE@ suališ:suali
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:š ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_SUALIŠ-SG ;
 N_SUALIŠ-PL ;

LEXICON N_SUALIŠ-SG !!≈ @CODE@ suališ:suali
:%{back%} NMN_SUALIŠ-SG ;

LEXICON N_SUALIŠ-PL !!≈ @CODE@ suališ:suali
:%{back%} NMN_SUALIŠ-PL ;

LEXICON N_OLUT !!≈ @CODE@ olut:olu
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
!:t ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_OLUT-SG ;
 N_OLUT-PL ;

LEXICON N_OLUT-SG
:%{back%} NMN_OLUT-SG ;

LEXICON N_OLUT-PL
:%{back%} NMN_OLUT-PL ;

LEXICON N_KEVÄT !!≈ @CODE@ kevät:kevä
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Front
!:t ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_KEVÄT-SG ;
 N_KEVÄT-PL ;

LEXICON N_KEVÄT-SG
:%{front%} NMN_KEVÄT-SG ;

LEXICON N_KEVÄT-PL
:%{front%} NMN_KEVÄT-PL ;

LEXICON N_TUHAT !!≈ @CODE@ tuhat:tuha
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
 N_TUHAT-SG ;
 N_TUHAT-PL ;

LEXICON N_TUHAT-SG
:%{back%} NMN_TUHAT-SG ;

LEXICON N_TUHAT-PL
:%{back%} NMN_TUHAT-PL ;

LEXICON N_ARMAS !!≈ @CODE@ armas:arma
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
    N_ARMAS-SG        ;
    N_ARMAS-PL        ;
LEXICON N_ARMAS-SG
:%{back%} NMN_ARMAS/EVAES-SG	;
LEXICON N_ARMAS-PL
:%{back%} NMN_ARMAS/EVAES-PL	;

!LEXICON N_EVAES !!≈ @CODE@ eväs:evä
!!! Gradation Yes
!!! Harmony: Front
!:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
!    N_EVAES-SG        ;
!    N_EVAES-PL        ;
!LEXICON N_EVAES-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_ARMAS/EVAES-SG	;
!LEXICON N_EVAES-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_ARMAS/EVAES-PL	;

LEXICON N_VARVAS !!≈ @CODE@ varvas:varba
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:%^WGStem%>s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
    N_VARVAS-SG        ;
    N_VARVAS-PL        ;
LEXICON N_VARVAS-SG
:%{back%} NMN_VARVAS-SG	;
LEXICON N_VARVAS-PL
:%{back%} NMN_VARVAS-PL	;


LEXICON N_PAREMBI !!≈ @CODE@ parembi:paremb
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
 N_PAREMBI-SG	  ;
 N_PAREMBI-PL	  ;

LEXICON N_PAREMBI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI-SG   ;
LEXICON N_PAREMBI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PESSYH !!≈ @CODE@ pessyh:pessy
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
 N_PESSYH-SG ;
 N_PESSYH-PL ;
LEXICON N_PESSYH-SG
:%{front%} NMN_TULLUH/PESSYH-SG ;
LEXICON N_PESSYH-PL
:%{front%} NMN_TULLUH/PESSYH-PL ;

!LEXICON N_TULLUH !!≈ @CODE@ tulluh
!!! Gradation NA
!!! Harmony: Front
!!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
! N_TULLUH-SG ;
! N_TULLUH-PL ;
!LEXICON N_TULLUH-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_TULLUH/PESSYH-SG ;
!LEXICON N_TULLUH-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_TULLUH/PESSYH-PL ;



LEXICON N_BEMMEL !!≈ @CODE@ bemmel:bembel
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
!:%^WGStem ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
    N_BEMMEL-SG        ;
    N_BEMMEL-PL        ;
LEXICON N_BEMMEL-SG
:%{front%} NMN_BEMMEL-SG	;
LEXICON N_BEMMEL-PL
:%{front%} NMN_BEMMEL-PL	;

!LEXICON N_VIDEL !!≈ @CODE@ videl:videl
!!! Gradation NA
!!! Harmony: Front
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
!    N_VIDEL-SG        ;
!    N_VIDEL-PL        ;
!LEXICON N_VIDEL-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_VIDEL-SG	;
!LEXICON N_VIDEL-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_VIDEL-PL	;



LEXICON N_SUURIM !!≈ @CODE@ suurim:suurim
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_SUURIM-SG  ;
        N_SUURIM-PL  ;

LEXICON N_SUURIM-SG
:%{back%} NMN_SUURIM-SG ;

LEXICON N_SUURIM-PL
:%{back%} NMN_SUURIM-PL ;

LEXICON N_TUATINDAM !!≈ @CODE@ tuatindam:tuatindam
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_TUATINDAM-SG  ;
        N_TUATINDAM-PL  ;

LEXICON N_TUATINDAM-SG
:%{back%} NMN_TUATINDAM-SG ;

LEXICON N_TUATINDAM-PL
:%{back%} NMN_TUATINDAM-PL ;


LEXICON N_TUATANDIM !!≈ @CODE@ tuatandim:tuatandim
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_TUATANDIM-SG  ;
        N_TUATANDIM-PL  ;

LEXICON N_TUATANDIM-SG
:%{back%} NMN_TUATANDIM-SG ;

LEXICON N_TUATANDIM-PL
:%{back%} NMN_TUATANDIM-PL ;

!LEXICON N_TYTÄRDIM !!≈ @CODE@ tytärdim:tytärdim
!!! Gradation NA
!!! Harmony: Front
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
!        N_TYTÄRDIM-SG  ;
!        N_TYTÄRDIM-PL  ;

!LEXICON N_TYTÄRDIM-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_TYTÄRDIM-SG ;

!LEXICON N_TYTÄRDIM-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_TYTÄRDIM-PL ;

LEXICON N_SIEMEN !!≈ @CODE@ siemen:siemen
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_SIEMEN-SG  ;
        N_SIEMEN-PL  ;

LEXICON N_SIEMEN-SG
        N_PAIMEN-SG  ;
LEXICON N_SIEMEN-PL
        N_PAIMEN-PL  ;


!LEXICON N_PAIMEN !!≈ @CODE@ paimen:paimen
!!! Gradation NA
!!! Harmony: Back
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
!        N_PAIMEN-SG  ;
!        N_PAIMEN-PL  ;

LEXICON N_PAIMEN-SG
:%{back%} NMN_PIENAR-SG ;

LEXICON N_PAIMEN-PL
:%{back%} NMN_PIENAR-PL ;


LEXICON N_SALBOIN !!≈ @CODE@ salboin:salboi
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
!:n ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_SALBOIN-SG  ;
        N_SALBOIN-PL  ;

LEXICON N_SALBOIN-SG
:%{back%} NMN_SALBOIN-SG ;
