src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
akansizär+N:akan#sizär N_PENGER  "vaimon sisar" ;
bloigeh+N:bloigeh N_TOVESTEH-SG  "kellojen sointi" ;
einehet+N:eineh N_PEREH-PL  "ruokatavara" ;
eläkeh+N:eläkkeh N_LIIKEH  "eläke" ;
erilažus+N:erilažu N_PUHTAHUS  "erimielisyys" ;
evähät+N:evä N_ARMAS-PL  "eväät" ;
galdari+N:galdaria N_ARTELI  "parveke" ;
haukeh+N:haukeh N_TOVESTEH  "(koiran) haukku" ;
heinänsiemenet+N:heinän#siemenet N_SIEMEN-PL  "heinänsiemen" ;
herkys+N:herky N_VÄHYS  "herkkyys" ;
hullavunnuh+N:hullavunnu N_PESSYH  "halvaantunut" ;
huobavus+N:huobavuks N_ALUS  "oras" ;
huuhmar+N:huuhmar N_PENGER  "huhmar" ;
hyppävys+N:hyppävyks N_ILVES  "hyppy" ;
hyvämieližys+N:hyvä#mieližy N_VÄHYS  "ystävällisyys" ;
häräkeh+N:häräkkeh N_LIIKEH  "oksikas puu" ;
hävinnyh+N:hävinny N_PESSYH  "hävinnyt" ;
höyhenet+N:höyhen N_SIEMEN-PL  "höyhenet" ;
instrumentutevolližus+N:instrumentu#tevolližu N_PUHTAHUS  "instrumenttiteollisuus" ;
iäven+N:iäven N_SIEMEN  "avanto" ;
joukkoveh+N:joukkoveh N_TOVESTEH  "joukkue" ;
jygevys+N:jygevy N_VÄHYS  "raskaus" ;
jyrineh+N:jyrineh N_PEREH  "jyrinä" ;
kameramies+N:kamera#mie N_MIES  "kameramies" ;
kangas+N:kanga N_ARMAS  "kangas" ;
kangassammal+N:kangas#sammal N_BEMMEL  "kangassammal" ;
karti+N:karti N_ARTELI  "pelikortti" ;
kerakeh+N:kerakkeh N_HUIKEH  "konsonantti" ;
kevät+N:kevä N_KEVÄT  "kevät" ;
kielekeh+N:kielekkeh N_LIIKEH  "kieleke" ;
kierdomečästys+N:kierdo#mečästyks N_ILVES  "ajometsästys" ;
kiistit+N:kiisti N_ARTELI-PL  "tupsut" ;
kilbuajelus+N:kilbu#ajeluks N_ALUS  "erä" ;
kirjain+N:kirjai N_SALBOIN  "kirjain" ;
kivyt+N:kivy N_OLUT  "kivi" ;
korokeh+N:korokkeh N_HUIKEH  "koroke" ;
kovasydämelližys+N:kova#sydämelližy N_VÄHYS  "kovasydämisyys" ;
kubineh+N:kubineh N_TOVESTEH  "kutina" ;
kudžoimätäs+N:kudžoi#mättä N_VARVAS  "muurahaiskeko" ;
kyynel+N:kyynel N_BEMMEL  "kyynel" ;
köyhen+N:köyhen N_SIEMEN  "hilse" ;
lehtyt+N:lehty N_OLUT  "pikku lehti" ;
liiteh+N:liitteh N_LIIKEH  "liite" ;
livvi+N:livvi N_ARTELI-SG  "livvi" ;
lounat+N:louna N_KEVÄT  "lounas" ;
lyyhtes+N:lyyhte N_ARMAS  "lyhde" ;
mahtollizus+N:mahtollizu N_PUHTAHUS  "mahdollisuus" ;
manner+N:manner N_PENGER  "manner" ;
medali+N:medali N_ARTELI  "mitali" ;
menetys+N:menetyks N_ILVES  "menetys" ;
merimies+N:meri#mie N_MIES  "merimies" ;
muamindam+N:muamindam N_TUATINDAM  "äitipuoli" ;
murreh+N:murdeh N_HUIKEH  "murre" ;
märeh+N:märeh N_PEREH  "märepala" ;
opastushuonus+N:opastus#huonuks N_ALUS  "koulurakennus" ;
orjus+N:orju N_PUHTAHUS-SG  "orjuus" ;
palannuh+N:palannu N_PESSYH  "palanut" ;
palčokset+N:palčoks N_ALUS-PL  "rohtimet" ;
penger+N:penger N_PENGER  "penger" ;
poijindam+N:poijindama N_TUATINDAM  "poikapuoli" ;
pordahat+N:porda N_VARVAS-PL  "portaat" ;
porras+N:porda N_VARVAS  "porras" ;
ruis+N:ruge N_KUURNIS  "ruis" ;
ruogeh+N:ruogeh N_TOVESTEH  "ravi (yougi)" ;
räkätys+N:räkätyks N_ILVES  "räkätys" ;
sablahat+N:sablahat N_ARMAS-PL  "sapilaat" ;
sportumies+N:sportumie N_MIES  "urheilija" ;
suališ+N:suale N_SUALIŠ  "saalis {sualehen, sualištu, sualehii}" ;
suališ+N:suale N_SUALIŠ  "saalis (sualehen, sualištu, sualehii)" ;
suališ+N+Err/Sub:suoliš N_SUALIŠ  "tienesti" ;
suares+N:suares N_AIGOMUS  "suosaari" ;
suojukset+N:suojuks N_ALUS-PL  "rakennukset" ;
suuhut+N:suuhut N_OLUT  "suu" ;
suurim+N:suurima N_SUURIM  "suurimo" ;
syväimykset+N:syväimyks N_ALUS-PL  "sisäelimet" ;
syväin+N:syväi N_SALBOIN  "sydän" ;
säes+N:säke N_VARVAS  "säde (yougi)" ;
taimen+N:taimen N_SIEMEN  "taimi" ;
taimenet+N:taimenet N_SIEMEN-PL  "taimet" ;
taivas+N:taiva N_ARMAS  "taivas" ;
tiedohuot+N:tiedohuot N_OLUT-PL  "noituus" ;
tiedokeskus+N:tiedo#keskuks N_ALUS  "tietokeskus" ;
tipeh+N:tipeh N_PEREH  "tippa" ;
tuatindam+N:tuatindam N_TUATINDAM  "isäpuoli" ;
turizmutuoteh+N:turizmu#tuotteh N_HUIKEH  "matkailutuote" ;
tytärdim+N:tytärdim N_TUATANDIM  "tytärpuoli" ;
vahnin+N:vahnin N_SUURIM  "vanhin" ;
vanhembat+N:vanhemb N_PAREMBI-PL  "vanhemmat" ;
vellekset+N:velleks N_ALUS-PL  "veljekset" ;
verikyynäl+N:veri#kyynäl N_BEMMEL  "katkera kyynel" ;
viivotin+N:viivoti N_SALBOIN  "viivotin" ;
vuozituhat+N:vuozi#tuha N_TUHAT  "vuosituhat" ;
yhtevys+N:yhtevy N_PUHTAHUS  "yhteys" ;
čilineh+N:čilineh N_PEREH  "helinä" ;
šampuni+N:šampuni N_ARTELI  "shampoo" ;
štanit+N:štani N_ARTELI-PL  "housut" ;
